Utah statutes.
17-53-301.   General powers, duties, and functions of county executive.
(1)  The elected county executive is the chief executive officer of the
county.
(2)  Except as expressly provided otherwise in statute and except as contrary
to the powers,  duties, and functions of other county officers expressly
provided for in Chapters 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, and 24, each county
executive shall exercise all executive powers, have all executive duties, and
perform all executive functions of the county, including those enumerated in
this part.
(3)  A county executive may take any action required by law and necessary to
the full discharge of the executive's duties, even though the action is not
expressly authorized in statute.
